Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-699
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act:

(1) Approved researcher means an individual or entity who is approved by the department in accordance with section 81-666 to obtain access to data contained in the Parkinson's Disease Registry to assist in scientific or medical research for the prevention, cure, or control of Parkinson's disease;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Parkinson's disease means a chronic, progressive disorder in which there is a lack of the chemical dopamine in the brain as a direct result of the destruction of the dopamine-producing cells in the portion of the brain called the substantia nigra. Clinical features of the disease include tremor at rest, slow movements, rigidity, and unsteady or shuffling gait and may be indicated by improvement after using medications used for Parkinson's disease; and

(4) Related movement disorder means a disorder that resembles Parkinson's disease in some way, such as another kind of tremor.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 750.